Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0909.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 2. As used in this act:
(a) "Charges" means the criminal complaint filed against the
plaintiff by a county prosecutor or the attorney general on behalf
of the people of this state that resulted in the conviction and
imprisonment of the plaintiff that are the subject of the claim for
compensation under this act.
(b) "Municipality" means a municipal corporation organized or
existing under the laws of this state, including a home rule city,
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


statutory city, village, or township. Municipality includes an
agency or department of the municipality and an officer of the
municipal corporation acting in an official capacity. Municipality
does not include a county, an agency or department of a county, or
a county official acting in an official capacity.
(c) (b) "New evidence" means any evidence that was not
presented in the proceedings leading to plaintiff's conviction, to
a trier of fact during a proceeding that determined guilt,
including new testimony, expert interpretation, the results of DNA
testing, or other test results relating to evidence that was
presented in the proceedings leading to plaintiff's conviction. to
a trier of fact when guilt was decided. New evidence does not
include a recantation by a witness unless there is other evidence
to support the recantation or unless the prosecuting attorney for
the county in which the plaintiff was convicted or, if the
department of attorney general prosecuted the case, the attorney
general agrees that the recantation constitutes new evidence
without other evidence to support the recantation.
(d) (c) "Plaintiff" means the individual making a claim for
compensation under this act. Plaintiff includes a trustee or
conservator for that individual if the individual is not competent
to act as plaintiff. Plaintiff does not include the estate of an a
deceased individual entitled to make a claim for compensation under
this act, the personal representative of the estate, or any heir,
devisee, beneficiary, or other person who is entitled under other
law to pursue a claim for damages, injury, or death suffered by the
individual.
(e) (d) "State correctional facility" means a correctional
facility maintained and operated by the department of corrections.
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


(f) (e) "This For the purpose of state court actions related
to this act, "this state" means the state of Michigan and its
political subdivisions, and the agencies, departments, commissions,
and courts of this state and its political subdivisions.
Sec. 4. (1) In an action under this act, the plaintiff shall
attach to his or her verified complaint documentation that
establishes all of the following:
(a) The plaintiff was convicted of 1 or more crimes under the
law of this state, was sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a
state correctional facility for the crime or crimes, and served at
least part of the sentence.
(b) The plaintiff's judgment of conviction was reversed or
vacated and either the charges were dismissed or on retrial the
plaintiff was found to be not guilty.
(c) New evidence demonstrates that the plaintiff was not the
perpetrator of the crime or crimes and was not an accessory or
accomplice to the acts that were the basis of the conviction and
resulted in a reversal or vacation of the judgment of conviction,
dismissal of the charges, finding of not guilty, or gubernatorial
pardon.the facts that the plaintiff alleges entitle the plaintiff
to judgment under section 5.
(2) A complaint filed under this section must be verified by
the plaintiff.
(3) A copy of a complaint filed under this section must be
served on the attorney general and on the prosecuting attorney for
the county in which the plaintiff was convicted. The attorney
general and the prosecuting attorney may answer and contest the
complaint. The prosecuting attorney shall file an appearance within
60 days if the prosecuting attorney wishes to participate further
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


in the action.
(4) An answer to a complaint filed under this section may be
served and filed not later than 60 days after service of the
complaint, with the opportunity to request additional time
extensions if there is a showing of good cause, in order for the
attorney general to determine whether compensation under this act
is appropriate before formal discovery begins.
(5) (4) If the plaintiff's conviction was for an assaultive
crime or a serious misdemeanor, the prosecuting attorney shall
notify the victim of the assaultive crime or serious misdemeanor of
the application in the same manner as is required for an
application to have a conviction set aside under section 22a or 77a
of the William Van Regenmorter crime victim's rights act, 1985 PA
87, MCL 780.772a and 780.827a. The prosecuting attorney shall give
the victim notice under this subsection by first-class mail sent to
the victim's last known address. The victim or victim's
representative has the right to appear at any proceeding under this
act concerning the complaint and to make a written or oral
statement.
(6) (5) The plaintiff, the attorney general, and the
prosecuting attorney for the county in which the plaintiff was
convicted may conduct discovery in an action under this act.
Discovery must not be conducted before the attorney general files
an answer.
Sec. 5. (1) In an action under this act, the plaintiff is
entitled to judgment in the plaintiff's favor if the plaintiff
proves all of the following by clear and convincing a preponderance
of the evidence:
(a) The plaintiff was convicted of 1 or more crimes under the
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


law of this state, was sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a
state correctional facility for the crime or crimes, and served at
least part of the sentence, or was committed to a residential
mental health facility in relation to the conviction.
(b) One of the following:
(i) The plaintiff's judgment of conviction was reversed or
vacated and either the charges were dismissed or the plaintiff was
determined on retrial to be not guilty. However, the plaintiff is
not entitled to compensation under this act if the plaintiff was
convicted of another criminal offense arising from the same
transaction and either that offense was not dismissed or the
plaintiff was convicted of that offense on retrial.
(ii) The plaintiff received a gubernatorial pardon on the basis
of actual innocence for the crime for which the plaintiff was
incarcerated.
(c) One of the following:
(i) New evidence demonstrates that the plaintiff did not
perpetrate the crime and was not an accomplice or accessory to the
acts that were the basis of the conviction, results and the new
evidence either resulted in the reversal or vacation of the charges
in the judgment of conviction or resulted in a gubernatorial pardon
, and results in either dismissal of all of the charges or a
finding of not guilty on all of the charges on retrial.for the
crime for which the plaintiff was incarcerated.
(ii) The reversal or vacation of the judgment of conviction was
on the basis of insufficient evidence supporting the conviction,
and the plaintiff did not perpetrate the crime and was not an
accomplice or accessory to the acts that were the basis of the
conviction.
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


(iii) New evidence was presented to the court that reversed or
vacated the plaintiff's conviction, but relief was granted on
another basis, and the new evidence demonstrates that the plaintiff
did not perpetrate the crime and was not an accomplice or accessory
to the acts that were the basis of the conviction.
(2) In determining whether the plaintiff has met his or her
burden under subsection (1) at any stage of the proceedings,
including at trial, the court may consider the following:
(a) The entire record of the plaintiff's criminal case, which
includes the lower court records, the plea or trial transcripts,
the appellate record, and the record of any postconviction
proceedings.
(b) Evidence that was seized or obtained in violation of the
Fourth Amendment of the United States Constitution or section 11 of
article I of the state constitution of 1963.
(3) In exercising its discretion regarding the weight and
credibility of the evidence presented by the parties, the court
shall give due consideration to the difficulties of proof caused by
the passage of time, the loss or destruction of evidence, the death
or unavailability of witnesses, and other factors not caused by the
parties. The court shall not find a witness incredible who
testified at the plaintiff's criminal trial or in post-trial
proceedings based solely on the fact that the witness is not
testifying at the trial held on the plaintiff's claim under this
act.
(4) (2) Subject to subsections (4) and (5), (6) and (7), if a
court finds that a plaintiff was wrongfully convicted and
imprisoned, the court shall award compensation as follows:
(a) Fifty thousand dollars for each year, from the date
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


prorated as provided in this subdivision as appropriate, the
plaintiff was imprisoned, until the date the plaintiff was released
from prison, including time served in pretrial detention,
regardless of whether the plaintiff was released from imprisonment
on parole or because the maximum sentence was served. For
incarceration of less than a year in prison, this amount is
prorated to 1/365 of $50,000.00 for every day the plaintiff was
incarcerated. in prison.
(b) Reimbursement of any amount awarded and collected by this
state under the state correctional facility reimbursement act, 1935
PA 253, MCL 800.401 to 800.406.
(c) Reasonable attorney fees incurred in an action under this
act. All Both of the following apply to attorney fees under this
act:
(i) The court shall not award attorney fees unless the
plaintiff has actually paid the amount awarded to the attorney.
(ii) It is not necessary that the plaintiff pay the attorney
fees before an initial award under this act. The court may award
attorney fees on a motion brought after the initial award.
(i) (iii) The attorney fees must not exceed 10% of the total
amount awarded under subdivisions (a) and (b) or $50,000.00,
whichever is less, plus expenses.
(ii) (iv) An award of attorney fees under this act may not be
deducted from the compensation awarded the plaintiff, and the
plaintiff's attorney is not entitled to receive additional fees
from the plaintiff.
(d) Standard annuity payments to compensate the plaintiff an
additional $50,000.00 for each year the plaintiff was imprisoned,
including time served in pretrial detention, prorated in the same
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


way as described in subdivision (a). All of the following apply to
annuity payments under this subdivision:
(i) The annuity payments must be payable in equal monthly
installments for the length of time the plaintiff was imprisoned,
including time served in pretrial detention.
(ii) The annuity payments must be based on a 5% per annum
interest rate and other actuarial factors within the discretion of
the department of treasury.
(iii) The annuity payments may not be accelerated, deferred,
increased, or decreased.
(iv) The plaintiff may not sell, mortgage, or otherwise
encumber or anticipate the payments, wholly or partly, by
assignment or otherwise.
(5) (3) An award under subsection (2) (4) is not subject to a
limit on the amount of damages except as stated in this act.
(6) (4) Compensation may not be awarded under subsection (2)
(4) for any time during which the plaintiff was imprisoned under a
concurrent or consecutive sentence for another conviction, whether
running before or after the sentence on the conviction that is the
basis of the claim. If the plaintiff was on parole for a prior
offense at the time of the wrongful conviction and parole was
revoked solely on the basis of the wrongful conviction, any
concurrent or consecutive sentence relating to the prior offense is
not covered by this subsection.
(7) (5) Compensation may not be awarded under subsection (2)
(4) for any injuries sustained by the plaintiff while imprisoned.
The making of a claim or receipt of compensation under this act
does not preclude a claim or action for compensation because of
injuries sustained by the plaintiff while imprisoned.
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


(8) (6) In the discretion of the court, the total amount
awarded under subsection (2)(a) (4)(a) and (b) may be paid to the
plaintiff in a single payment or in multiple payments. If the court
orders the compensation to be paid in multiple payments, the
initial payment must be 20% of the total amount awarded or more and
the remainder of the payments must be made over not more than 10
years.
(9) (7) An award of compensation, or a compromise or
settlement of a claim, under this act is not a finding of
wrongdoing against anyone. An The granting or denial of a claim for
an award of compensation, or a compromise or settlement of a claim,
under this act is not admissible in evidence in a civil action that
is related to the investigation, prosecution, or conviction that
gave rise to the wrongful conviction or imprisonment.
(10) (8) The acceptance by the plaintiff of an award under
this act, or of a compromise or settlement of the claim, must be in
writing and, unless it is procured by fraud, is final and
conclusive on the plaintiff , constitutes a complete release of all
claims against this state, and is a complete bar to any action in
state court by the plaintiff against this state based on the same
subject matter. However, the acceptance by the plaintiff of an
award under this act, or of a compromise or settlement of the
plaintiff's claim, does not operate as a waiver of, or bar to, any
action and recovery in federal court against an a municipality or
individual alleged to have been involved in the investigation,
prosecution, or conviction that gave rise to the wrongful
conviction or imprisonment.
(11) (9) A compensation award under subsection (2) (4), or
compensation under a compromise or settlement of a claim under this
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


act, may not be offset by any of the following:
(a) Expenses incurred by this state or any political
subdivision of this state, including, but not limited to, expenses
incurred to secure the plaintiff's custody or to feed, clothe, or
provide medical services for the plaintiff while imprisoned,
including expenses required to be collected under the state
correctional facility reimbursement act, 1935 PA 253, MCL 800.401
to 800.406. The attorney general is specifically excused from
complying with the state correctional facility reimbursement act,
1935 PA 253, MCL 800.401 to 800.406.
(b) The value of any services awarded to the plaintiff under
this section.
(c) The value of any reduction in fees for services awarded to
the plaintiff under this act.
(12) (10) An award under subsection (2) (4), or compensation
under a compromise or settlement of a claim under this act, is not
subject to income taxes.
(13) (11) A compensation award, or compensation under a
compromise or settlement of a claim, under this act is subject to
the payment of child support, including child support arrearages,
owed by the plaintiff. The plaintiff remains liable for any child
support or arrearage under the office of child support act, 1971 PA
174, MCL 400.231 to 400.240, and the support and parenting time
enforcement act, 1982 PA 295, MCL 552.601 to 552.650, except for
any child support or arrearage that erroneously accrued while the
plaintiff was imprisoned. Child support must be deducted from an
award, or compensation under a compromise or settlement of a claim,
under this act before the plaintiff receives any of the money from
the award, compromise, or settlement. This subsection does not
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


affect any ongoing child support obligation of the plaintiff.
(14) (12) This act does not impair or limit the right of a
state or local government to collect a debt of a plaintiff from the
plaintiff's award of compensation, or compensation under a
compromise or settlement of a claim, under this act.
(15) (13) An award of compensation, or compensation under a
compromise or settlement of a claim, under this act is subject to
setoff or reimbursement for damages received directly by the
plaintiff that were obtained for the wrongful conviction or
imprisonment from any other person or political subdivision, after
the damage award is reduced for attorney fees.
(16) (14) If a court determines that a plaintiff was
wrongfully convicted and imprisoned, the court shall enter an order
that provides that any record of the arrest, fingerprints,
conviction, and sentence of the plaintiff related to the wrongful
conviction be expunged from the criminal history record. The
parties may stipulate to the entry of an order under this
subsection without an award of compensation under subsection (4)(a)
and (d). A document that is the subject of an order entered under
this subsection is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of
information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246.
Sec. 7. (1) An action for compensation under this act must be
commenced within 3 years after the entry of a verdict, order, or
judgment, or pardon as the result of an event described in section
4(1)(b). 5(1)(b). Any action by this state challenging or appealing
a verdict, order, or judgment entered as the result of an event
described in section 4(1)(b) 5(1)(b) tolls the 3-year period.
(2) An individual convicted, imprisoned, and released from
custody before March 29, 2017 must commence an action under this
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0


act within 18 months after the effective date of the 2020
amendatory act that amended this section.before September 3, 2021.
(3) An individual may, irrespective of any other provision of
this act, bring a claim within 18 months after the effective date
of the amendatory act that added this subsection, if the individual
can show that he or she qualifies for an award as a result of
section 5(1)(c)(ii) or (iii).
Final Page
TDR S03963'25 (S-1) my4ov0